Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6408.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 8-10 of the General Laws entitled "Family Court" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
8-10-23.5. Smithfield juvenile hearing board.
The town of Smithfield shall have the authority to create a juvenile hearing board subject
to the provisions of § 8-10-23.1, notwithstanding the requirements of the town’s regulations, charter
or ordinances.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003050
========